North Carolina statutes. Chapter 113. Conservation and Development.
Article 17. Administrative Provisions; Regulatory Authority of Marine Fisheries Commission and Department.
§ 113-229.
Permits to dredge or fill in or about estuarine waters or State-owned lakes.

Except as hereinafter provided before any excavation or filling project is begun in any estuarine waters, tidelands, marshlands, or State-owned lakes, the party or parties desiring to do such shall first obtain a permit from the Department. Granting of the State permit shall not relieve any party from the necessity of obtaining a permit from the United States Army Corps of Engineers for work in navigable waters, if the same is required. The Department shall continue to coordinate projects pertaining to navigation with the United States Army Corps of Engineers.

All applications for such permits shall include a plat of the areas in which the proposed work will take place, indicating the location, width, depth and length of any proposed channel, the disposal area, and a copy of the deed or other instrument under which the applicant claims title to the property adjoining the waters in question, (or any land covered by waters), tidelands, or marshlands, or if the applicant is not the owner, then a copy of the deed or other instrument under which the owner claims title plus written permission from the owner to carry out the project on his land.

In lieu of a deed or other instrument referred to in subsection (b) of this section, the agency authorized to issue such permits may accept some other reasonable evidence of ownership of the property in question or other lawful authority to make use of the property.

(c1)

The Coastal Resources Commission may, by rule, designate certain classes of major and minor development for which a general or blanket permit may be issued. In developing these rules, the Commission shall consider all of the following:

The size of the development.

The impact of the development on areas of environmental concern.

How often the class of development is carried out.

The need for on-site oversight of the development.

The need for public review and comment on individual development projects.

(c2)

General permits may be issued by the Commission as rules under the provisions of

G.S. 113A-118.1

. Individual development carried out under the provisions of general permits shall not be subject to the mandatory notice provisions of this section. The Commission may impose reasonable notice provisions and other appropriate conditions and safeguards on any general permit it issues. The variance, appeals, and enforcement provisions of this Article shall apply to any individual development projects undertaken under a general permit.

An applicant for a permit, other than an emergency permit, shall notify the owner of each tract of riparian property that adjoins that of the applicant. An applicant may satisfy the required notification of adjoining riparian property owners by either (i) obtaining from each adjoining riparian property owner a signed statement that the adjoining riparian property owner has no objection to the proposed project or (ii) providing a copy of the applicant’s permit application to each adjoining riparian property owner by certified mail. If the owner’s address is unknown and cannot be ascertained with due diligence or if a diligent but unsuccessful effort has been made to serve the copy by certified mail, publication in accordance with the rules of the Commission shall serve to satisfy the notification requirement. An owner may file written objections to the permit with the Department for 30 days after the owner is served with a copy of the application by certified mail. In the case of a special emergency dredge or fill permit the applicant must certify that the applicant took all reasonable steps to notify adjacent riparian owners of the application for a special emergency dredge and fill permit prior to submission of the application. Upon receipt of this certification, the Secretary shall issue or deny the permit within the time period specified in subsection (e) of this section, upon the express understanding from the applicant that the applicant will be entirely liable and hold the State harmless for all damage to adjacent riparian landowners directly and proximately caused by the dredging or filling for which approval may be given.

Applications for permits except special emergency permit applications shall be circulated by the Department among all State agencies and, in the discretion of the Secretary, appropriate federal agencies having jurisdiction over the subject matter which might be affected by the project so that such agencies will have an opportunity to raise any objections they might have. The Department may deny an application for a dredge or fill permit upon finding: (1) that there will be significant adverse effect of the proposed dredging and filling on the use of the water by the public; or (2) that there will be significant adverse effect on the value and enjoyment of the property of any riparian owners; or (3) that there will be significant adverse effect on public health, safety, and welfare; or (4) that there will be significant adverse effect on the conservation of public and private water supplies; or (5) that there will be significant adverse effect on wildlife or fresh water, estuarine or marine fisheries. In the absence of such findings, a permit shall be granted. Such permit may be conditioned upon the applicant amending his proposal to take whatever measures are reasonably necessary to protect the public interest with respect to the factors enumerated in this subsection. Permits may allow for projects granted a permit the right to maintain such project for a period of up to 10 years. The right to maintain such project shall be granted subject to such conditions as may be reasonably necessary to protect the public interest. The Coastal Resources Commission shall coordinate the issuance of permits under this section and

G.S. 113A-118

and the granting of variances under this section and

G.S. 113A-120.1

to avoid duplication and to create a single, expedited permitting process. The Coastal Resources Commission may adopt rules interpreting and applying the provisions of this section and rules specifying the procedures for obtaining a permit under this section. Maintenance work as defined in this subsection shall be limited to such activities as are required to maintain the project dimensions as found in the permit granted. The Department shall act on an application for permit within 75 days after the completed application is filed, provided the Department may extend such deadline by not more than an additional 75 days if necessary properly to consider the application, except for applications for a special emergency permit, in which case the Department shall act within two working days after an application is filed, and failure to so act shall automatically approve the application.

(e1)

The Secretary is empowered to issue special emergency dredge or fill permits upon application. Emergency permits may be issued only when life or structural property is in imminent danger as a result of rapid recent erosion or sudden failure of a man-made structure. The Coastal Resources Commission may elaborate by rule upon what conditions the Secretary may issue a special emergency dredge or fill permit. The Secretary may condition the emergency permit upon any reasonable conditions, consistent with the emergency situation, he feels are necessary to reasonably protect the public interest. Where an application for a special emergency permit includes work beyond which the Secretary, in his discretion, feels necessary to reduce imminent dangers to life or property he shall issue the emergency permit only for that part of the proposed work necessary to reasonably reduce the imminent danger. All further work must be applied for by application for an ordinary dredge or fill permit. The Secretary shall deny an application for a special dredge or fill permit upon a finding that the detriment to the public which would occur on issuance of the permit measured by the five factors in G.S. 113-229(e) clearly outweighs the detriment to the applicant if such permit application should be denied.

A permit applicant who is dissatisfied with a decision on his application may file a petition for a contested case hearing under

G.S. 150B-23

within 20 days after the decision is made. Any other person who is dissatisfied with a decision to deny or grant a permit may file a petition for a contested case hearing only if the Coastal Resources Commission determines, in accordance with G.S. 113A-121.1(c), that a hearing is appropriate. A permit is suspended from the time a person seeks administrative review of the decision concerning the permit until the Commission determines that the person seeking the review cannot commence a contested case or the issuance of a final decision in a contested case, as appropriate, and no action may be taken during that time that would be unlawful in the absence of the permit.

G.S. 113A-122

applies to an appeal of a permit decision under subsection (f).

Repealed by Session Laws 1987, c. 827, s. 105.

(h1)

Except as provided in subsection (h2) of this section, all construction and maintenance dredgings of beach-quality sand may be placed on the affected downdrift ocean beaches or, if placed elsewhere, an equivalent quality and quantity of sand from another location shall be placed on the downdrift ocean beaches.

(h2)

Clean, beach quality material dredged from navigational channels within the active nearshore, beach or inlet shoal systems shall not be removed permanently from the active nearshore, beach or inlet shoal system. This dredged material shall be disposed of on the ocean beach or shallow active nearshore area where it is environmentally acceptable and compatible with other uses of the beach.

Subject to subsections (h1) and (h2) of this section, all materials excavated pursuant to such permit, regardless of where placed, shall be encased or entrapped in such a manner as to minimize their moving back into the affected water.

None of the provisions of this section shall relieve any riparian owner of the requirements imposed by the applicable laws and regulations of the United States.

Any person, firm, or corporation violating the provisions of this section shall be guilty of a Class 2 misdemeanor. Each day’s continued operation after notice by the Department to cease shall constitute a separate offense. A notice to cease shall be served personally or by certified mail.

The Secretary may, either before or after the institution of proceedings under subsection (k) of this section, institute a civil action in the superior court in the name of the State upon the relation of the Secretary, for damages, and injunctive relief, and for such other and further relief in the premises as said court may deem proper, to prevent or recover for any damage to any lands or property which the State holds in the public trust, and to restrain any violation of this section or of any provision of a dredging or filling permit issued under this section. Neither the institution of the action nor any of the proceedings thereon shall relieve any party to such proceedings from the penalty prescribed by this section for any violation of the same.

This section shall apply to all persons, firms, or corporations, their employees, agents, or contractors proposing excavation or filling work in the estuarine waters, tidelands, marshlands and State-owned lakes within the State, and the work to be performed by the State government or local governments. Provided, however, the provisions of this section shall not apply to the activities and functions of the Department and local health departments that are engaged in mosquito control for the protection of the health and welfare of the people of the coastal area of North Carolina as provided under

G.S. 130A-346

through G.S. 130A-349. Provided, further, this section shall not impair the riparian right of ingress and egress to navigable waters.

Within the meaning of this section:

“State-owned lakes” include man-made as well as natural lakes.

“Estuarine waters” means all the waters of the Atlantic Ocean within the boundary of North Carolina and all the waters of the bays, sounds, rivers, and tributaries thereto seaward of the dividing line between coastal fishing waters and inland fishing waters agreed upon by the Department and the Wildlife Resources Commission, within the meaning of

G.S. 113-129

.

“Marshland” means any salt marsh or other marsh subject to regular or occasional flooding by tides, including wind tides (whether or not the tidewaters reach the marshland areas through natural or artificial watercourses), provided this shall not include hurricane or tropical storm tides. Salt marshland or other marsh shall be those areas upon which grow some, but not necessarily all, of the following salt marsh and marsh plant species: Smooth or salt water Cordgrass (Spartina alterniflora), Black Needlerush (Juncus roemerianus), Glasswort (Salicornia spp.), Salt Grass (Distichlis spicata), Sea Lavender (Limonium spp.), Bulrush (Scirpus spp.), Saw Grass (Cladium jamaicense), Cattail (Typha spp.), Salt-Meadow Grass (Spartina patens), and Salt Reed-Grass (Spartina cynosuroides).

History.

1969, c. 791, s. 1; 1971, c. 1159, s. 6; 1973, c. 476, s. 128; c. 1262, ss. 28, 86; c. 1331, s. 3; 1975, c. 456, ss. 1-7; 1977, c. 771, s. 4; 1979, c. 253, ss. 1, 2; 1983, c. 258, ss. 1-3; c. 442, s. 2; 1987, c. 827, s. 105; 1989, c. 727, s. 107; 1993, c. 539, s. 844; 1994, Ex. Sess., c. 24, s. 14(c); 1993 (Reg. Sess., 1994), c. 777, s. 6(a), (b); 1995, c. 509, s. 55.1(a)-(c); 2000-172, ss. 3.1, 3.2; 2002-126, ss. 29.2(h)-(j); 2011-398, s. 36; 2013-413, s. 55; 2014-115, s. 17.

Safety of Shallow Draft Navigation Channels and Oregon Inlet Land Acquisition Task Force.

Session Laws 2013-138, ss. 1, 2, and 3.1 through 3.8, provide: “Section 1. For purposes of this act, the following definitions apply:

“(1) ‘Department’ means the Department of Environment and Natural Resources.

“(2) ‘Corps’ means the United States Army Corps of Engineers.

“(3) ‘Shallow draft navigation channel’ means (i) a waterway connection with a maximum depth of 16 feet between the Atlantic Ocean and a bay or the Atlantic Intracoastal Waterway, (ii) a river entrance to the Atlantic Ocean through which tidal and other currents flow, or (iii) other interior coastal waterways. ‘Shallow draft navigation channel‘includes the Atlantic Intracoastal Waterway and its side channels, Beaufort Harbor, Bogue Inlet, Carolina Beach Inlet, the channel from Back Sound to Lookout Back, channels connected to federal navigation channels, Lockwoods Folly River, Manteo/Shallowbag Bay, including Oregon Inlet, Masonboro Inlet, New River, New Topsail Inlet, Rodanthe, Rollinson, Shallotte River, Silver Lake Harbor, and the waterway connecting Pamlico Sound and Beaufort Harbor.

“Section 2. The Department shall take all of the following steps in order to ensure that the State’s shallow draft navigation channels are safe and navigable:

“(1) The Department shall utilize long-term agreements with Corps to maintain the dredging of the State’s shallow draft navigation channels to depths authorized on the date this act becomes law.

“(2) The Department shall assist local governments in their pursuit of general permit authorizations from the Corps to allow the local governments to dredge shallow draft navigation channels to depths and according to project designs authorized on the date this act becomes law.

“(3) The Department shall assist local governments in their pursuit of individual permits under the State Coastal Area Management Act permits issued by the Corps to allow the dredging of shallow draft navigation channels to depths greater than authorized on the date this act becomes law and to allow the placement of dredged materials on beaches.

“Section 3.1. There is hereby created the Oregon Inlet Land Acquisition Task Force for the purpose of determining, reviewing, and considering the State’s options for acquiring the federal government’s right, title, and interest in Oregon Inlet and the real property adjacent thereto, including submerged lands. A more particular description of the property to be acquired is provided in Section 3.8 of this act. Acquiring the property described in Section 3.8 of this act will allow the State to preserve Oregon Inlet and to develop long-term management solutions for preserving and enhancing the navigability of Oregon Inlet, which is both a critical transportation corridor and a critical source of commerce for the State’s Outer Banks. The Task Force shall have duties including the following:

“(1)
Consulting with the State Property Office and agencies and departments of the federal government, including the United States Department of Fish and Wildlife, United States National Park Service, Congressional Budget Office, and members of the North Carolina congressional delegation to establish the monetary value of Oregon Inlet and the real property adjacent thereto.

“(2)
Determining whether and to what degree the federal government will sell to the State Oregon Inlet and the real property adjacent thereto or exchange the property for State-owned real property. If the federal government expresses a willingness to exchange the property for State-owned property, the Task Force shall determine the identity of the State-owned property and the monetary value of the property.

“(3)
Exploring any and all options for acquiring Oregon Inlet and the real property adjacent thereto, including condemnation of the coastal lands conveyed to the federal government in a deed dated August 7, 1958, and recorded September 3, 1958, in the Dare County Registry of Deeds.

“(4)
Considering any other issues deemed relevant by the Task Force that are related to the acquisition of Oregon Inlet and the real property adjacent thereto.

“Section 3.2.
The Task Force shall consist of the following 13 members:

“(1)
The Governor or the Governor’s designee, who shall be chair.

“(2)
The Commissioner of Agriculture and Consumer Services or the Commissioner’s designee.

“(3)
The Secretary of the Department of Administration or the Secretary’s designee.

“(4)
The Secretary of the Department of Commerce or the Secretary’s designee.

“(5)
The Secretary of the Department of Environment and Natural Resources or the Secretary’s designee.

“(6)
The Secretary of the Department of Public Safety or the Secretary’s designee.

“(7)
The Secretary of the Department of Transportation or the Secretary’s designee.

“(8)
The Attorney General or the Attorney General’s designee.

“(9)
Two members of the Senate appointed by the General Assembly upon the recommendation of the President Pro Tempore of the Senate.

“(10) Two members of the House of Representatives appointed by the General Assembly upon the recommendation of the Speaker of the House of Representatives.

“(11) The chair of the Dare County Board of Commissioners or the chair’s designee.

“Section 3.3. The terms of the members appointed under Section 3.2 of this act shall commence on July 1, 2013. A vacancy on the Task Force shall be filled by the Governor, except that a vacancy in an appointment by the General Assembly shall be filled by the original appointing authority.

“Section 3.4. The Task Force shall meet at the call of the Governor. All members of the Task Force are voting members. A majority of the members of the Task Force constitutes a quorum.

“Section 3.5. Members of the Task Force shall receive no compensation for their service, but may receive per diem, travel, and subsistence allowances in accordance with

G.S. 120-3.1

, 138-5, and 138-6, as appropriate. No State funds shall be appropriated to the Task Force or to any State agency or department for the Task Force.

“Section 3.6.
The Department of Commerce shall provide staff to the Task Force. All State agencies and departments shall provide assistance to the Task Force upon request.

“Section 3.7.
By May 1, 2014, the Task Force shall submit a report detailing its findings and recommendations to the Speaker of the House of Representatives, the President Pro Tempore of the Senate, and the General Assembly. The Task Force shall terminate upon the filing of the report required by this section.”

Session Laws 2013-138, s. 3.8, provided a list of latitude and longitude points of the federally owned property to be acquired by the State.

Session Laws 2014-100, s. 14.7(a)-(h), authorizes the initiation of negotiations by the Department of Administration with the appropriate federal authority for the acquisition of certain federally owned property for the creation of Oregon Inlet State Park. If the subject real property is acquired by the State, then, together with any other real property owned by the State within the subject area, the Department of Environment and Natural Resources is authorized to add Oregon Inlet State Park to the State Parks System. The provisions of Session Laws 2014-100, s. 14.7(a)-(h), further provides for the condemnation authority necessary to manage existing and future transportation corridors on the Outer Banks, and for the identification of federally owned property necessary to construct or manage existing and future transportation corridors on the Outer Banks.

§ 113-230.
Orders to control activities in coastal wetlands.

The Secretary, with the approval of the Coastal Resources Commission, may from time to time, for the purpose of promoting the public safety, health, and welfare, and protecting public and private property, wildlife and marine fisheries, adopt, amend, modify, or repeal orders regulating, restricting, or prohibiting dredging, filling, removing or otherwise altering coastal wetlands. In this section, the term “coastal wetlands” shall mean any marsh as defined in G.S. 113-229(n)(3), as amended, and such contiguous land as the Secretary reasonably deems necessary to affect by any such order in carrying out the purposes of this section.

The Secretary shall, before adopting, amending, modifying or repealing any such order, hold a public hearing thereon in the county in which the coastal wetlands to be affected are located, giving notice thereof to interested State agencies and each owner or claimed owner of such wetlands by certified or registered mail at least 21 days prior thereto.

Upon adoption of any such order or any order amending, modifying or repealing the same, the Secretary shall cause a copy thereof, together with a plan of the lands affected and a list of the owners or claimed owners of such lands, to be recorded in the register of deeds office in the county where the land is located, and shall mail a copy of such order and plan to each owner or claimed owner of such lands affected thereby.

Any person, firm or corporation that violates any order issued under the provisions of this section shall be guilty of a Class 2 misdemeanor.

The superior court shall have jurisdiction in equity to restrain violations of such orders.

Any person having a recorded interest in or registered claim to land affected by any such order may, within 90 days after receiving notice thereof, petition the superior court to determine whether the petitioner is the owner of the land in question, and in case he is adjudged the owner of the subject land, whether such order so restricts the use of his property as to deprive him of the practical uses thereof and is therefore an unreasonable exercise of the police power because the order constitutes the equivalent of a taking without compensation. If the court finds the order to be an unreasonable exercise of the police power, as aforesaid, the court shall enter a finding that such order shall not apply to the land of the petitioner; provided, however, that such finding shall not affect any other land than that of the petitioner. The Secretary shall cause a copy of such finding to be recorded forthwith in the register of deeds office in the county where the land is located. The method provided in this subsection for the determination of the issue of whether any such order constitutes a taking without compensation shall be exclusive, and such issue shall not be determined in any other proceeding.

After a finding has been entered that such order shall not apply to certain land as provided in the preceding subsection, the Department of Administration, upon the request of the Coastal Resources Commission, shall take the fee or any lesser interest in such land in the name of the State by eminent domain under the provisions of Chapter 146 of the General Statutes and hold the same for the purposes set forth in this section.

This section shall not repeal the powers, duties and responsibilities of the Department under the provisions of

G.S. 113-229

.

History.

1971, c. 1159, s. 7; 1973, c. 1262, ss. 28, 86; 1977, c. 771, s. 4; 1979, c. 253, s. 4; 1989, c. 727, s. 108; 1993, c. 539, s. 845; 1994, Ex. Sess., c. 24, s. 14(c).

Legal Periodicals.

For article, “Now Open for Development?: The Present State of Regulation of Activities in North Carolina Wetlands,” see 79 N.C.L. Rev. 1667 (2001).

§§ 113-231 through 113-240.

Reserved for future codification purposes.